Illinois, session 104th, HB3098.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Electronics Recycling Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1-5, 1-10, 1-15, 1-25, 1-30, 61-33, 1-35, 1-40, 1-45, 1-84.5, 1-85, 1-86, and 1-90 and by 7adding Section 1-91 as follows: 8    (415 ILCS 151/1-5)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)10    Sec. 1-5. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 12Agency.13    "Best practices" means standards for collecting and 14preparing items for shipment and recycling. "Best practices" 15may include standards for packaging for transport, load size, 16acceptable load contamination levels, non-CED items included 17in a load, and other standards as determined under Section 181-85 of this Act. "Best practices" shall consider the desired 19intent to preserve existing collection programs and 20relationships when possible.21    "Collector" means a person who collects residential CEDs 22from covered entities at any program collection site or 23one-day collection event and prepares them for transport.  HB3098 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    "Computer", often referred to as a "personal computer" or 2"PC", means a desktop or notebook computer as further defined 3below and used only in a residence, but does not mean an 4automated typewriter, electronic printer, mobile telephone, 5portable hand-held calculator, portable digital assistant 6(PDA), MP3 player, or other similar device. "Computer" does 7not include computer peripherals, commonly known as cables, 8mouse, or keyboard. "Computer" is further defined as either:9        (1) "Desktop computer", which means an electronic, 10    magnetic, optical, electrochemical, or other high-speed 11    data processing device performing logical, arithmetic, or 12    storage functions for general purpose needs that are met 13    through interaction with a number of software programs 14    contained therein, and that is not designed to exclusively 15    perform a specific type of logical, arithmetic, or storage 16    function or other limited or specialized application. 17    Human interface with a desktop computer is achieved 18    through a stand-alone keyboard, stand-alone monitor, or 19    other display unit, and a stand-alone mouse or other 20    pointing device, and is designed for a single user. A 21    desktop computer has a main unit that is intended to be 22    persistently located in a single location, often on a desk 23    or on the floor. A desktop computer is not designed for 24    portability and generally utilizes an external monitor, 25    keyboard, and mouse with an external or internal power 26    supply for a power source. Desktop computer does not   HB3098 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    include an automated typewriter or typesetter; or2        (2) "Notebook computer", which means an electronic, 3    magnetic, optical, electrochemical, or other high-speed 4    data processing device performing logical, arithmetic, or 5    storage functions for general purpose needs that are met 6    through interaction with a number of software programs 7    contained therein, and that is not designed to exclusively 8    perform a specific type of logical, arithmetic, or storage 9    function or other limited or specialized application. 10    Human interface with a notebook computer is achieved 11    through a keyboard, video display greater than 4 inches in 12    size, and mouse or other pointing device, all of which are 13    contained within the construction of the unit that 14    comprises the notebook computer; supplemental stand-alone 15    interface devices typically can also be attached to the 16    notebook computer. Notebook computers can use external, 17    internal, or batteries for a power source. Notebook 18    computer does not include a portable hand-held calculator, 19    or a portable digital assistant or similar specialized 20    device. A notebook computer has an incorporated video 21    display greater than 4 inches in size and can be carried as 22    one unit by an individual. A notebook computer is 23    sometimes referred to as a laptop computer.24        (3) "Tablet computer", which means an electronic, 25    magnetic, optical, electrochemical, or other high-speed 26    data processing device performing logical, arithmetic, or   HB3098 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    storage functions for general purpose needs that are met 2    through interaction with a number of software programs 3    contained therein, and that is not designed to exclusively 4    perform a specific type of logical, arithmetic, or storage 5    function or other limited or specialized application. 6    Human interface with a tablet computer is achieved through 7    a touch screen and video display screen greater than 6 8    inches in size (all of which are contained within the unit 9    that comprises the tablet computer). Tablet computers may 10    use an external or internal power source. "Tablet 11    computer" does not include a portable hand-held 12    calculator, a portable digital assistant, or a similar 13    specialized device.14    "Computer monitor" means an electronic device that is a 15cathode-ray tube or flat panel display primarily intended to 16display information from a computer and is used only in a 17residence.18    "County recycling coordinator" means the individual who is 19designated as the recycling coordinator for a county in a 20waste management plan developed pursuant to the Solid Waste 21Planning and Recycling Act.22    "Covered electronic device" or "CED" means any computer, 23computer monitor, television, printer, electronic keyboard, 24facsimile machine, videocassette recorder, portable digital 25music player that has memory capability and is battery 26powered, digital video disc player, video game console,   HB3098 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1electronic mouse, scanner, digital converter box, cable 2receiver, satellite receiver, digital video disc recorder, or 3small-scale server, home audio component, or peripheral sold 4at retail. "Covered electronic device" does not include any of 5the following:6        (1) an electronic device that is a part of a motor 7    vehicle or any component part of a motor vehicle assembled 8    by or for a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, 9    including replacement parts for use in a motor vehicle;10        (2) an electronic device that is functionally or 11    physically part of a larger piece of equipment or that is 12    taken out of service from an industrial, commercial 13    (including retail), library checkout, traffic control, 14    kiosk, security (other than household security), 15    governmental, agricultural, or medical setting, including 16    but not limited to diagnostic, monitoring, or control 17    equipment; or18        (3) an electronic device that is contained within a 19    clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator 20    and freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, 21    dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, water 22    pump, sump pump, or air purifier. To the extent allowed 23    under federal and State laws and regulations, a CED that 24    is being collected, recycled, or processed for reuse is 25    not considered to be hazardous waste, household waste, 26    solid waste, or special waste.   HB3098 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    "Covered electronic device category" or "CED category" 2means each of the following 9 8 categories of residential CEDs 3from covered entities:4        (1) computers and small-scale servers;5        (2) computer monitors;6        (3) televisions;7        (4) printers, facsimile machines, and scanners;8        (5) digital video disc players, digital video disc 9    recorders, and videocassette recorders;10        (6) video game consoles;11        (7) digital converter boxes, cable receivers, and 12    satellite receivers; and13        (8) electronic keyboards, electronic mice, 14    peripherals, and portable digital music players that have 15    memory capability and are battery powered; and . 16        (9) home audio components. 17    "Covered entity" means a residence for program years 2019 18through 2026 and means a person delivering 7 or fewer CEDs to a 19program collection site or collection event beginning in 20program year 2027. 21    "Manufacturer" means a person, or a successor in interest 22to a person, under whose brand or label a CED is or was sold at 23retail. For any CED sold at retail under a brand or label that 24is licensed from a person who is a mere brand owner and who 25does not sell or produce a CED, the person who produced the CED 26or his or her successor in interest is the manufacturer. For   HB3098 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1any CED sold at retail under the brand or label of both the 2retail seller and the person that produced the CED, the person 3that produced the CED, or his or her successor in interest, is 4the manufacturer. "Manufacturer" does not include a person who 5manufactures only peripherals and no other CEDs. 6    "Manufacturer clearinghouse" means an entity that prepares 7and submits a manufacturer e-waste program plan to the Agency, 8and oversees the manufacturer e-waste program, on behalf of a 9group of 2 or more manufacturers cooperating with one another 10to collectively establish and operate an e-waste program for 11the purpose of complying with this Act and that collectively 12represent at least 50% of the manufacturers' total obligations 13under this Act for a program year.14    "Manufacturer e-waste program" means any program 15established, financed, and operated by a manufacturer, 16individually or collectively as part of a manufacturer 17clearinghouse, to transport and subsequently recycle, in 18accordance with the requirements of this Act, residential CEDs 19from covered entities collected at program collection sites 20and one-day collection events.21    "Municipal joint action agency" means a municipal joint 22action agency created under Section 3.2 of the 23Intergovernmental Cooperation Act.24    "One-day collection event" means a one-day event used as a 25substitute for a program collection site pursuant to Section 261-15 of this Act.  HB3098 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    "Peripheral" means a device sold exclusively for external 2use with a CED as a wireless or corded device that provides 3input into or output from a CED and cords used with a CED or 4peripheral. A peripheral may be collected with or without the 5CED with which it is used. 6    "Person" means an individual, partnership, co-partnership, 7firm, company, limited liability company, corporation, 8association, joint stock company, trust, estate, political 9subdivision, State agency, or any other legal entity; or a 10legal representative, agent, or assign of that entity. 11"Person" includes a unit of local government.12    "Printer" means desktop printers, multifunction printer 13copiers, and printer/fax combinations taken out of service 14from a residence that are designed to reside on a work surface, 15and include various print technologies, including without 16limitation laser and LED (electrographic), ink jet, dot 17matrix, thermal, and digital sublimation, and "multi-function" 18or "all-in-one" devices that perform different tasks, 19including without limitation copying, scanning, faxing, and 20printing. Printers do not include floor-standing printers, 21printers with optional floor stand, point of sale (POS) 22receipt printers, household printers such as a calculator with 23printing capabilities or label makers, or non-stand-alone 24printers that are embedded into products that are not CEDs.25    "Private network collection site" means a collection site 26operated by a nonprofit organization or recycler collecting on   HB3098 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1behalf of a manufacturer. 2    "Program collection site" means a physical location that 3is included in a manufacturer e-waste program and at which 4residential CEDs from covered entities are collected and 5prepared for transport by a collector during a program year in 6accordance with the requirements of this Act. Except as 7otherwise provided in this Act, "program collection site" does 8not include a retail or private network collection site.9    "Program year" means a calendar year. The first program 10year is 2019.11    "Recycler" means any person who transports or subsequently 12recycles residential CEDs from covered entities that have been 13collected and prepared for transport by a collector at any 14program collection site or one-day collection event.15    "Recycling" has the meaning provided under Section 3.380 16of the Environmental Protection Act. "Recycling" includes any 17process by which residential CEDs from covered entities that 18would otherwise be disposed of or discarded are collected, 19separated, or processed and returned to the economic 20mainstream in the form of raw materials or products.21    "Residence" means a dwelling place or home in which one or 22more individuals live.23    "Residential covered electronic device" or "residential 24CED" means any covered electronic device taken out of service 25from a residence in the State.26    "Retail collection site" means a private sector collection   HB3098 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1site operated by a retailer collecting on behalf of a 2manufacturer.3    "Retailer" means a person who first sells, through a sales 4outlet, catalogue, or the Internet, a covered electronic 5device at retail to an individual for residential use or any 6permanent establishment primarily where merchandise is 7displayed, held, stored, or offered for sale to the public.8    "Sale" means any retail transfer of title for 9consideration of title including, but not limited to, 10transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the 11Internet or any other similar electronic means. "Sale" does 12not include financing or leasing.13    "Small-scale server" means a computer that typically uses 14desktop components in a desktop form designed primarily to 15serve as a storage host for other computers. To be considered a 16small-scale server, a computer must: be designed in a 17pedestal, tower, or other form that is similar to that of a 18desktop computer so that all data processing, storage, and 19network interfacing is contained within one box or product; be 20designed to be operational 24 hours per day and 7 days per 21week; have very little unscheduled downtime, such as on the 22order of hours per year; be capable of operating in a 23simultaneous multi-user environment serving several users 24through networked client units; and be designed for an 25industry-accepted operating system for home or low-end server 26applications.  HB3098 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    "Television" means an electronic device that contains a 2cathode-ray tube or flat panel screen the size of which is 3greater than 4 inches when measured diagonally and is intended 4to receive video programming via broadcast, cable, satellite, 5Internet, or other mode of video transmission or to receive 6video from surveillance or other similar cameras.7(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17; 8100-592, eff. 6-22-18.) 9    (415 ILCS 151/1-10)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)11    Sec. 1-10. Manufacturer e-waste program. 12    (a) For program year 2019 and each program year 13thereafter, each manufacturer shall, individually or 14collectively as part of a manufacturer clearinghouse, provide 15a manufacturer e-waste program to transport and subsequently 16recycle, in accordance with the requirements of this Act, 17residential CEDs from covered entities collected at, and 18prepared for transport from, the program collection sites and 19one-day collection events included in the program during the 20program year.21    (b) Each manufacturer e-waste program must include, at a 22minimum, the following:23        (1) satisfaction of the convenience standard described 24    in Section 1-15 of this Act;25        (2) instructions for designated county recycling   HB3098 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    coordinators and municipal joint action agencies to 2    annually file notice to participate in the program;3        (3) transportation and subsequent recycling of the 4    residential CEDs from covered entities collected at, and 5    prepared for transport from, the program collection sites 6    and one-day collection events included in the program 7    during the program year; and8        (4) submission of a report to the Agency, by March 1, 9    2020, and each March 1 thereafter, which includes:10            (A) the total weight of all residential CEDs from 11        covered entities transported from program collection 12        sites and one-day collection events throughout the 13        State during the preceding program year by CED 14        category;15            (B) the total weight of residential CEDs from 16        covered entities transported from all program 17        collection sites and one-day collection events in each 18        county in the State during the preceding program year 19        by CED category; and20            (C) the total weight of residential CEDs from 21        covered entities transported from all program 22        collection sites and one-day collection events in each 23        county in the State during that preceding program year 24        and that was recycled.25    (c) Each manufacturer e-waste program shall make the 26instructions required under paragraph (2) of subsection (b)   HB3098 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1available on its website by December 1, 2017, and the program 2shall provide to the Agency a hyperlink to the website for 3posting on the Agency's website.4    (d) Nothing in this Act shall prevent a manufacturer from 5accepting, through a manufacturer e-waste program, residential 6CEDs from covered entities collected through a curbside or 7drop-off collection program that is operated pursuant to a 8residential franchise collection agreement authorized by 9Section 11-19-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code or Section 105-1048 of the Counties Code between a third party and a unit of 11local government located within a county or municipal joint 12action agency that has elected to participate in a 13manufacturer e-waste program. 14    (e) A collection program operated in accordance with this 15Section shall: 16        (1) meet the collector responsibilities under 17    subsections (a), (a-5), (d), (e), and (g) under Section 18    1-45 and require certification on the bill of lading or 19    similar manifest from the unit of local government, the 20    third party, or and the county or municipal joint action 21    agency that elected to participate in the manufacturer 22    e-waste program that the CEDs were collected, to the best 23    of their knowledge, from covered entities residential 24    consumers in the State of Illinois;25        (2) comply with the audit provisions under subsection 26    (g) of Section 1-30;  HB3098 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1        (3) locate any drop-off location where CEDs are 2    collected on property owned by a unit of local government; 3    and4        (4) have signage at any drop-off location indicating 5    only residential CEDs from covered entities are accepted 6    for recycling.7    Manufacturers of CEDs are not financially responsible for 8transporting and consolidating CEDs collected from a 9collection program's drop-off location. Any drop-off location 10used in 2019 must have been identified by the county or 11municipal joint action agency in the written notice of 12election to participate in the manufacturer e-waste program in 13accordance with Section 1-20 by March 1, 2018. Any drop-off 14location operating in 2020 or in subsequent years must be 15identified by the county or municipal joint action agency in 16the annual written notice of election to participate in a 17manufacturer e-waste program in accordance with Section 1-20 18to be eligible for the subsequent program year. 19(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17; 20100-592, eff. 6-22-18; 100-1165, eff. 6-1-19; 101-81, eff. 217-12-19.)  22    (415 ILCS 151/1-15)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)24    Sec. 1-15. Convenience standard for program collection   HB3098 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1sites and one-day collection events. 2    (a) Beginning in 2019 each manufacturer e-waste program 3for a program year must include, at a minimum, program 4collection sites in the following quantities in counties that 5elect to participate in the manufacturer e-waste program for 6the program year: 7        (1) one program collection site in each county that 8    has elected to participate in the manufacturer e-waste 9    program for the program year and that has a population 10    density that is less than 250 individuals per square mile; 11        (2) two program collection sites in each county that 12    has elected to participate in the manufacturer e-waste 13    program for the program year and that has a population 14    density that is greater than or equal to 250 individuals 15    per square mile but less than 500 individuals per square 16    mile; 17        (3) three program collection sites in each county that 18    has elected to participate in the manufacturer e-waste 19    program for the program year and that has a population 20    density that is greater than or equal to 500 individuals 21    per square mile but less than 750 individuals per square 22    mile; 23        (4) four program collection sites in each county that 24    has elected to participate in the manufacturer e-waste 25    program for the program year and that has a population 26    density that is greater than or equal to 750 individuals   HB3098 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    per square mile but less than 1,000 individuals per square 2    mile; 3        (5) five program collection sites in each county that 4    has elected to participate in the manufacturer e-waste 5    program for the program year and that has a population 6    density that is greater than or equal to 1,000 individuals 7    per square mile but less than 5,000 individuals per square 8    mile; and 9        (6) fifteen program collection sites in each county 10    that has elected to participate in the manufacturer 11    e-waste program for the program year and that has a 12    population density that is greater than or equal to 5,000 13    individuals per square mile. 14    For purposes of this Section, county population densities 15shall be based on the entire county's population density, 16regardless of whether a municipality or municipal joint action 17agency in the county participates in a manufacturer e-waste 18program. 19    If a municipality with a population of over 1,000,000 20residents elects to participate in a manufacturer e-waste 21program for a program year, then the program shall provide 10 22additional program collection sites for the program year to be 23located in that municipality, and the program collection sites 24required under paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of this Section 25shall be located outside of the municipality.26    If a municipal joint action agency elects to participate   HB3098 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1in a manufacturer e-waste program for a program year, it shall 2receive, for that year, a population-based pro rata share of 3the program collection sites that would be granted to the 4county in which the municipal joint action agency is located 5if the county were to elect to participate in the program for 6that year, rounded to the nearest whole number. 7    A designated county recycling coordinator may elect to 8operate more than the required minimum number of collection 9sites.10    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Section, any 11county, municipality, or municipal joint action agency that 12elects to participate in a manufacturer e-waste program may 13enter into a written agreement with the operators of any 14manufacturer e-waste program in order to do one or more of the 15following: 16        (1) to decrease the number of program collection sites 17    in the county, municipality, or territorial boundary of 18    the municipal joint action agency for the program year; 19        (2) to substitute a program collection site in the 20    county, municipality, or territorial boundary of the 21    municipal joint action agency with either (i) 4 one-day 22    collection events or (ii) a different number of such 23    events as may be provided in the written agreement; 24        (3) to substitute the location of a program collection 25    site in the county, municipality, or territorial boundary 26    of the municipal joint action agency for the program year   HB3098 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    with another location; 2        (4) to substitute the location of a one-day collection 3    in the county, municipality, or territorial boundary of 4    the municipal joint action agency with another location; 5    or 6        (5) to use, with the agreement of the applicable 7    retailer, nonprofit organization, or recycler, a retail or 8    private network collection site as a program collection 9    site. 10    An agreement made pursuant to paragraph (1), or (2), or 11(5) of this subsection (b) shall be reduced to writing and 12included in the manufacturer e-waste program plan as required 13under subsection (a) of Section 1-25 of this Act. 14(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17.) 15    (415 ILCS 151/1-25)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)17    Sec. 1-25. Manufacturer e-waste program plans. 18    (a) By September 1, 2018 for program year 2019, and by July 191 of each year thereafter, each manufacturer shall, 20individually or through a manufacturer clearinghouse, submit 21to the Agency a manufacturer e-waste program plan, which 22includes, at a minimum, the following: 23        (1) the contact information for the individual who 24    will serve as the point of contact for the manufacturer 25    e-waste program;   HB3098 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1        (2) the identity of each county that has elected to 2    participate in the manufacturer e-waste program during the 3    program year; 4        (3) for each county, the location of each program 5    collection site and one-day collection event included in 6    the manufacturer e-waste program for the program year; 7        (4) the collector operating each program collection 8    site and one-day collection event included in the 9    manufacturer e-waste program for the program year; 10        (5) the recyclers that manufacturers plan to use 11    during the program year to transport and subsequently 12    recycle residential CEDs from covered entities under the 13    program, with the updated list of recyclers to be provided 14    to the Agency no later than December 1 preceding each 15    program year; 16        (6) an explanation of any deviation by the program 17    from the standard program collection site distribution set 18    forth in subsection (a) of Section 1-15 of this Act for the 19    program year, along with copies of all written agreements 20    made pursuant to paragraphs (1), or (2), or (5) of 21    subsection (b) of Section 1-15 for the program year; and22        (7) if a group of 2 or more manufacturers are 23    participating in a manufacturer clearinghouse, 24    certification that the methodology used for allocating 25    responsibility for the transportation and recycling of 26    residential CEDs from covered entities by manufacturers   HB3098 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    participating in the manufacturer clearinghouse for the 2    program year will be in compliance with the allocation 3    methodology established under Section 1-84.5 of this Act; 4    and . 5        (8) identification of collection service provided to 6    every county of the state, including program collection 7    sites, program collection events, retail collection sites, 8    and private network collection sites. 9    (b) Within 60 days after receiving a manufacturer e-waste 10program plan, the Agency shall review the plan and approve the 11plan or disapprove the plan. 12        (1) If the Agency determines that the program 13    collection sites and one-day collection events specified 14    in the plan will satisfy the convenience standard set 15    forth in Section 1-15 of this Act, then the Agency shall 16    approve the manufacturer e-waste program plan and provide 17    written notification of the approval to the individual who 18    serves as the point of contact for the manufacturer. The 19    Agency shall make the approved plan available on the 20    Agency's website.21        (2) If the Agency determines the plan will not satisfy 22    the convenience standard set forth in Section 1-15 of this 23    Act, then the Agency shall disapprove the manufacturer 24    e-waste program plan and provide written notification of 25    the disapproval and the reasons for the disapproval to the 26    individual who serves as the point of contact for the   HB3098 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    manufacturer. Within 30 days after the date of 2    disapproval, the manufacturer shall submit a revised 3    manufacturer e-waste program plan that addresses the 4    deficiencies noted in the Agency's disapproval. 5    (c) Manufacturers shall assume financial responsibility 6for carrying out their e-waste program plans, including, but 7not limited to, financial responsibility for providing the 8packaging materials necessary to prepare shipments of 9collected residential CEDs from covered entities in compliance 10with subsection (e) of Section 1-45, as well as financial 11responsibility for bulk transportation and recycling of 12collected residential CEDs from covered entities. 13(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17; 14100-592, eff. 6-22-18; 100-1165, eff. 6-1-19; 101-81, eff. 157-12-19.) 16    (415 ILCS 151/1-30)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)18    Sec. 1-30. Manufacturer registration. 19    (a) By April 1, 2018, and by April 1 of each year 20thereafter for the upcoming program year, beginning with 21program year 2019, each manufacturer who sells CEDs in the 22State must register with the Agency by: (i) submitting to the 23Agency a $5,000 registration fee; and (ii) completing and 24submitting to the Agency the registration form prescribed by 25the Agency. Information on the registration form shall   HB3098 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1include, without limitation, all of the following:2        (1) a list of all of the brands and labels under which 3    the manufacturer's CEDs are marketed and sold or offered 4    for sale in the State to individuals; and5        (2) the total weights, by CED category, of CEDs sold 6    in the United States to individuals, under any of the 7    manufacturer's brands or labels, during the calendar year 8    that is 2 years before the applicable program year.9    If, during a program year, any of the manufacturer's CEDs 10are sold or offered for sale in the State under a brand that is 11not listed in the manufacturer's registration, then, within 30 12days after the first sale or offer for sale under that brand, 13the manufacturer must amend its registration to add the brand. 14All registration fees collected by the Agency pursuant to this 15Section shall be deposited into the Solid Waste Management 16Fund. 17    (b) The Agency shall post on its website a list of all 18registered manufacturers.19    (c) Beginning in program year 2019, a manufacturer whose 20CEDs are sold or offered for sale in this State for the first 21time on or after April 1 of a program year must register with 22the Agency within 30 days after the date the CEDs are first 23sold or offered for sale in the State.24    (d) Beginning in program year 2019, manufacturers shall 25ensure that only recyclers that have registered with the 26Agency and meet the recycler standards set forth in Section   HB3098 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b11-40 are used to transport or recycle residential CEDs from 2covered entities collected at any program collection site or 3one-day collection event. 4    (e) Beginning in program year 2019, no manufacturer may 5sell or offer for sale a CED in this State unless the 6manufacturer is registered and operates a manufacturer program 7either individually or as part of the manufacturer 8clearinghouse as required in this Act. 9    (f) Beginning in program year 2019, no manufacturer may 10sell or offer for sale a CED in this State unless the 11manufacturer's brand name is permanently affixed to, and is 12readily visible on, the CED. 13    (g) In accordance with a contract or agreement with a 14county, municipality, or municipal joint action agency that 15has elected to participate in a manufacturer e-waste program 16under this Act, manufacturers may, either individually or 17through the manufacturer clearinghouse, audit program 18collection sites and proposed program collection sites for 19compliance with the terms and conditions of the contract or 20agreement. Audits shall be conducted during normal business 21hours, and a manufacturer or its designee shall provide 22reasonable notice to the collection site in advance of the 23audit. Audits of all program collection sites may include, 24among other things, physical site location visits and 25inspections and review of processes, procedures, technical 26systems, reports, and documentation reasonably related to the   HB3098 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1collecting, sorting, packaging, and recycling of residential 2CEDs from covered entities in compliance with this Act.3    (h) Nothing in this Act shall require a manufacturer or 4manufacturer e-waste program to collect, transport, or recycle 5any CEDs other than residential CEDs from covered entities, or 6to accept for transport or recycling any pallet or bulk 7container of residential CEDs from covered entities that has 8not been prepared by the collector for shipment in accordance 9with subsection (e) of Section 1-45. 10(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17; 11100-592, eff. 6-22-18.) 12    (415 ILCS 151/1-33)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)14    Sec. 1-33. Manufacturer clearinghouse.15    (a) A manufacturer e-waste program plan submitted by a 16manufacturer clearinghouse may take into account and 17incorporate individual plans or operations of one or more 18manufacturers that are participating in the manufacturer 19clearinghouse.20    (b) If a manufacturer clearinghouse allocates 21responsibility to manufacturers for manufacturers' 22transportation and recycling of residential CEDs from covered 23entities during a program year as part of a manufacturer 24e-waste program plan, then the manufacturer clearinghouse 25shall identify the allocation methodology in its plan   HB3098 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1submission to the Agency pursuant to Section 1-25 of this Act 2for review and approval. Any allocation of responsibility 3among manufacturers for the collection of covered electronic 4devices shall be in accordance with the allocation methodology 5established pursuant to Section 1-84.5 of this Act.6    (c) A manufacturer clearinghouse shall have no authority 7to enforce manufacturer compliance with the requirements of 8this Act, including compliance with the allocation methodology 9set forth in a manufacturer e-waste program plan, but shall, 10upon prior notice to the manufacturer, refer any potential 11non-compliance to the Agency. A manufacturer clearinghouse may 12develop and implement policies and procedures that exclude 13from participation in the manufacturer clearinghouse any 14manufacturers found by the Illinois Pollution Control Board or 15a court of competent jurisdiction to have failed to comply 16with this Act.17(Source: P.A. 100-592, eff. 6-22-18.) 18    (415 ILCS 151/1-35)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)20    Sec. 1-35. Retailer responsibilities. 21    (a) Beginning in program year 2019, no retailer who first 22sells, through a sales outlet, catalogue, or the Internet, a 23CED at retail to an individual for residential use may sell or 24offer for sale any CED in or for delivery into this State 25unless:   HB3098 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1        (1) the CED is labeled with a brand, and the label is 2    permanently affixed and readily visible; and 3        (2) the manufacturer is registered with the Agency at 4    the time the retailer purchases the CED. 5    (b) A retailer shall be considered to have complied with 6paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) if: 7        (1) a manufacturer registers with the Agency within 30 8    days of a retailer taking possession of the manufacturer's 9    CED; 10        (2) a manufacturer's registration expires and the 11    retailer ordered the CED prior to the expiration, in which 12    case the retailer may sell the CED, but only if the sale 13    takes place within 180 days of the expiration; or 14        (3) a manufacturer is no longer conducting business 15    and has no successor in interest, in which case the 16    retailer may sell any orphan CED ordered prior to the 17    discontinuation of business. 18    (c) Retailers shall not be considered collectors under the 19convenience standard and retail collection sites shall not be 20considered a collection site for the purposes of the 21convenience standard pursuant to Sections 1-10, 1-15, and 1-25 22unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the (i) retailer, 23(ii) operators of the manufacturer e-waste program, and (iii) 24the applicable county, municipal joint action agency, or 25municipality if the county, municipal joint action agency, or 26municipality elects to participate in the manufacturer e-waste   HB3098 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1program. If retailers agree to participate in a county program 2collection site, then the retailer collection site does not 3have to collect all CEDs or register as a collector.4    (d) Manufacturers may use retail or private network 5collection sites for satisfying some or all of their 6obligations pursuant to Sections 1-10, 1-15 and 1-25. 7    (e) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a retailer or 8private network collection site from collecting a fee for each 9CED collected.10(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17.) 11    (415 ILCS 151/1-40)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)13    Sec. 1-40. Recycler responsibilities. 14    (a) By January 1, 2019, and by January 1 of each year 15thereafter for that program year, beginning with program year 162019, each recycler must register with the Agency by (i) 17submitting to the Agency a $3,000 registration fee and (ii) 18completing and submitting to the Agency the registration form 19prescribed by the Agency. The registration form prescribed by 20the Agency shall include, without limitation, the address of 21each location where the recycler manages residential CEDs from 22covered entities collected through a manufacturer e-waste 23program and the certification required under subsection (d) of 24this Section. All registration fees collected by the Agency 25pursuant to this Section shall be deposited into the Solid   HB3098 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1Waste Management Fund. 2    (a-5) The Agency may deny a registration under this 3Section if the recycler or any employee or officer of the 4recycler has a history of:5        (1) repeated violations of federal, State, or local 6    laws, regulations, standards, or ordinances related to the 7    collection, recycling, or other management of CEDs;8        (2) conviction in this State or another state of any 9    crime which is a felony under the laws of this State, or 10    conviction of a felony in a federal court; or conviction 11    in this State or another state or federal court of any of 12    the following crimes: forgery, official misconduct, 13    bribery, perjury, or knowingly submitting false 14    information under any environmental law, regulation, or 15    permit term or condition; or16        (3) gross carelessness or incompetence in handling, 17    storing, processing, transporting, disposing, or otherwise 18    managing CEDs. 19    (b) The Agency shall post on the Agency's website a list of 20all registered recyclers. 21    (c) Beginning in program year 2019, no person may act as a 22recycler of residential CEDs from covered entities for a 23manufacturer's e-waste program unless the recycler is 24registered with the Agency as required under this Section. 25    (d) Beginning in program year 2019, recyclers must, as a 26part of their annual registration, certify compliance with all   HB3098 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1of the following requirements: 2        (1) Recyclers must comply with federal, State, and 3    local laws and regulations, including federal and State 4    minimum wage laws, specifically relevant to the handling, 5    processing, and recycling of residential CEDs from covered 6    entities and must have proper authorization by all 7    appropriate governing authorities to perform the handling, 8    processing, and recycling. 9        (2) Recyclers must implement the appropriate measures 10    to safeguard occupational and environmental health and 11    safety, through the following: 12            (A) environmental health and safety training of 13        personnel, including training with regard to material 14        and equipment handling, worker exposure, controlling 15        releases, and safety and emergency procedures; 16            (B) an up-to-date, written plan for the 17        identification and management of hazardous materials; 18        and 19            (C) an up-to-date, written plan for reporting and 20        responding to exceptional pollutant releases, 21        including emergencies such as accidents, spills, 22        fires, and explosions. 23        (3) Recyclers must maintain (i) commercial general 24    liability insurance or the equivalent corporate guarantee 25    for accidents and other emergencies with limits of not 26    less than $1,000,000 per occurrence and $1,000,000   HB3098 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    aggregate and (ii) pollution legal liability insurance 2    with limits not less than $1,000,000 per occurrence for 3    companies engaged solely in the dismantling activities and 4    $5,000,000 per occurrence for companies engaged in 5    recycling. 6        (4) Recyclers must maintain on file documentation that 7    demonstrates the completion of an environmental health and 8    safety audit completed and certified by a competent 9    internal and external auditor annually. A competent 10    auditor is an individual who, through professional 11    training or work experience, is appropriately qualified to 12    evaluate the environmental health and safety conditions, 13    practices, and procedures of the facility. Documentation 14    of auditors' qualifications must be available for 15    inspection by Agency officials and third-party auditors. 16        (5) Recyclers must maintain on file proof of workers' 17    compensation and employers' liability insurance. 18        (6) Recyclers must provide adequate assurance, such as 19    bonds or corporate guarantees, to cover environmental and 20    other costs of the closure of the recycler's facility, 21    including cleanup of stockpiled equipment and materials. 22        (7) Recyclers must apply due diligence principles to 23    the selection of facilities to which components and 24    materials, such as plastics, metals, and circuit boards, 25    from residential CEDs from covered entities are sent for 26    reuse and recycling.   HB3098 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1        (8) Recyclers must establish a documented 2    environmental management system that is appropriate in 3    level of detail and documentation to the scale and 4    function of the facility, including documented regular 5    self-audits or inspections of the recycler's environmental 6    compliance at the facility. 7        (9) Recyclers must use the appropriate equipment for 8    the proper processing of incoming materials as well as 9    controlling environmental releases to the environment. The 10    dismantling operations and storage of residential CED 11    components from covered entities that contain hazardous 12    substances must be conducted indoors and over impervious 13    floors. Storage areas must be adequate to hold all 14    processed and unprocessed inventory. When heat is used to 15    soften solder and when residential CED components from 16    covered entities are shredded, operations must be designed 17    to control indoor and outdoor hazardous air emissions. 18        (10) Recyclers must establish a system for identifying 19    and properly managing components, such as circuit boards, 20    batteries, cathode-ray tubes, and mercury phosphor lamps, 21    that are removed from residential CEDs from covered 22    entities during disassembly. Recyclers must properly 23    manage all hazardous and other components requiring 24    special handling from residential CEDs from covered 25    entities consistent with federal, State, and local laws 26    and regulations. Recyclers must provide visible tracking,   HB3098 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    such as hazardous waste manifests or bills of lading, of 2    hazardous components and materials from the facility to 3    the destination facilities and documentation, such as 4    contracts, stating how the destination facility processes 5    the materials received. No recycler may send, either 6    directly or through intermediaries, hazardous wastes to 7    solid non-hazardous waste landfills or to non-hazardous 8    waste incinerators for disposal or energy recovery. For 9    the purpose of these guidelines, smelting of hazardous 10    wastes to recover metals for reuse in conformance with all 11    applicable laws and regulations is not considered disposal 12    or energy recovery. 13        (11) Recyclers must use a regularly implemented and 14    documented monitoring and record-keeping program that 15    tracks for CEDs from covered entities total inbound 16    residential CED material weights and total subsequent 17    outbound weights to each destination, injury and illness 18    rates, and compliance with applicable permit parameters 19    including monitoring of effluents and emissions. Recyclers 20    must maintain contracts or other documents, such as sales 21    receipts, suitable to demonstrate: (i) the reasonable 22    expectation that there is a downstream market or uses for 23    designated electronics, which may include recycling or 24    reclamation processes such as smelting to recover metals 25    for reuse; and (ii) that any residuals from recycling or 26    reclamation processes, or both, are properly handled and   HB3098 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    managed to maximize reuse and recycling of materials to 2    the extent practical. 3        (12) Recyclers must employ industry-accepted 4    procedures for the destruction or sanitization of data on 5    hard drives and other data storage devices. Acceptable 6    guidelines for the destruction or sanitization of data are 7    contained in the National Institute of Standards and 8    Technology's Guidelines for Media Sanitation or those 9    guidelines certified by the National Association for 10    Information Destruction. 11        (13) No recycler may employ prison labor in any 12    operation related to the collection, transportation, and 13    recycling of CEDs. No recycler may employ any third party 14    that uses or subcontracts for the use of prison labor. 15    (e) Each recycler shall, during each calendar year, 16transport from each site that the recycler uses to manage 17residential CEDs from covered entities not less than 75% of 18the total weight of residential CEDs from covered entities 19present at the site during the preceding calendar year. Each 20recycler shall maintain on-site records that demonstrate 21compliance with this requirement and shall make those records 22available to the Agency for inspection and copying.23    (f) Nothing in this Act shall prevent a person from acting 24as a recycler independently of a manufacturer e-waste program.25(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17.)   HB3098 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    (415 ILCS 151/1-45)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)3    Sec. 1-45. Collector responsibilities. 4    (a) By January 1, 2019, and by January 1 of each year 5thereafter for that program year, beginning with program year 62019, a person acting as a collector under a manufacturer 7e-waste program shall register with the Agency by completing 8and submitting to the Agency the registration form prescribed 9by the Agency. The registration form prescribed by the Agency 10must include, without limitation, the address of each location 11at which the collector accepts residential CEDs from covered 12entities. 13    (a-5) The Agency may deny a registration under this 14Section if the collector or any employee or officer of the 15collector has a history of:16        (1) repeated violations of federal, State, or local 17    laws, regulations, standards, or ordinances related to the 18    collection, recycling, or other management of CEDs;19        (2) conviction in this State or another state of any 20    crime which is a felony under the laws of this State, or 21    conviction of a felony in a federal court; or conviction 22    in this State or another state or federal court of any of 23    the following crimes: forgery, official misconduct, 24    bribery, perjury, or knowingly submitting false 25    information under any environmental law, regulation, or 26    permit term or condition; or  HB3098 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1        (3) gross carelessness or incompetence in handling, 2    storing, processing, transporting, disposing, or otherwise 3    managing CEDs. 4    (b) The Agency shall post on the Agency's website a list of 5all registered collectors. 6    (c) Manufacturers and recyclers acting as collectors shall 7so indicate on their registration under Section 1-30 or 1-40 8of this Act. 9    (d) By March 1, 2020 and every March 1 thereafter, each 10collector that operates a program collection site or one-day 11collection event shall report, to the Agency and to the 12manufacturer e-waste program, the total weight, by CED 13category, of residential CEDs from covered entities 14transported from the program collection site or one-day 15collection event during the previous program year.16    (e) Each collector that operates a program collection site 17or one-day event shall ensure that the collected residential 18CEDs from covered entities are sorted and loaded in compliance 19with local, State, and federal law. In addition, at a minimum, 20the collector shall also comply with the following 21requirements:22        (1) residential CEDs from covered entities must be 23    accepted at the program collection site or one-day 24    collection event unless otherwise provided in this Act; 25        (2) residential CEDs from covered entities shall be 26    kept separate from other material and shall be:  HB3098 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1            (A) packaged in a manner to prevent breakage; and 2            (B) loaded onto pallets and secured with plastic 3        wrap or in pallet-sized bulk containers prior to 4        shipping; and 5            (C) on average per collection site 18,000 pounds 6        per shipment, and if not then the recycler may charge 7        the collector a prorated charge on the shortfall in 8        weight, not to exceed $600, unless the total 9        collection weight from a one-day collection is less 10        than 18,000 pounds, for which the recycler shall not 11        charge the collector for any shortfall from a minimum 12        of two one-day collection events per program year, 13        with the waiver of the shortfall for any additional 14        events to be made at the sole discretion of the 15        recycler;16        (3) residential CEDs from covered entities shall be 17    sorted into the following categories: 18            (A) computer monitors and televisions containing a 19        cathode-ray tube, other than televisions with wooden 20        exteriors; 21            (B) computer monitors and televisions containing a 22        flat panel screen; 23            (C) all covered televisions that are residential 24        CEDs from covered entities; 25            (D) computers; 26            (E) all other residential CEDs from covered   HB3098 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1        entities; and 2            (F) any electronic device that is not part of the 3        manufacturer program that the collector has arranged 4        to have picked up with residential CEDs from covered 5        entities and for which a financial arrangement has 6        been made to cover the recycling costs outside of the 7        manufacturer program; 8        (4) containers holding the CEDs must be structurally 9    sound for transportation; and10        (5) each shipment of residential CEDs from covered 11    entities from a program collection site or one-day 12    collection event shall include a collector-prepared bill 13    of lading or similar manifest, which describes the origin 14    of the shipment and the number of pallets or bulk 15    containers of residential CEDs from covered entities in 16    the shipment. 17    (f) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this Section, 18each collector that operates a program collection site or 19one-day collection event during a program year shall accept 20all residential CEDs from covered entities that are delivered 21to the program collection site or one-day collection event 22during the program year. 23    (g) No collector that operates a program collection site 24or one-day collection event shall: 25        (1) accept, at the program collection site or one-day 26    collection event, more than 7 residential CEDs from   HB3098 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    covered entities from an individual at any one time; 2        (2) scrap, salvage, dismantle, or otherwise 3    disassemble any residential CED from a covered entity 4    collected at a program collection site or one-day 5    collection event;6        (3) deliver to a manufacturer e-waste program, through 7    its recycler, any CED other than a residential CED from a 8    covered entity collected at a program collection site or 9    one-day collection event; or10        (4) deliver to a person other than the manufacturer 11    e-waste program or its recycler, a residential CED from a 12    covered entity collected at a program collection site or 13    one-day collection event. 14    (h) Beginning in program year 2019, registered collectors 15participating in county supervised collection programs may 16collect a fee for each desktop computer monitor or television 17accepted for recycling to cover costs for collection and 18preparation for bulk shipment or to cover costs associated 19with the requirements of subsection (e) of Section 1-45. 20    (i) Nothing in this Act shall prevent a person from acting 21as a collector independently of a manufacturer e-waste 22program. 23(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17.) 24    (415 ILCS 151/1-84.5)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)  HB3098 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    Sec. 1-84.5. Manufacturer clearinghouse; allocation of 2financial responsibility for the transportation and recycling 3of covered electronic devices.4    (a) As used in this Section, unless the context otherwise 5requires:6    "Adjusted total proportional responsibility" means the 7percentage calculated for each participating manufacturer for 8a program year under subsection (f) of this Section.9    "Market share" means the percentage that results from 10dividing:11        (1) the product of the total weight reported for a CED 12    category by a manufacturer, for the calendar year 2 years 13    before the applicable program year, under paragraph (2) of 14    subsection (a) of Section 1-30 of this Act, multiplied by 15    the population adjustment factor for that year; by16        (2) the product of the total weight reported for that 17    CED category by all manufacturers, for the calendar year 2 18    years before the applicable program year, under paragraph 19    (2) of subsection (a) of Section 1-30 of this Act, 20    multiplied by the population adjustment factor for that 21    year.22    "Participating manufacturer" means a manufacturer that a 23manufacturer clearinghouse has listed, pursuant to subsection 24(c) of this Section, as a participant in the manufacturer 25clearinghouse for a program year. 26    "Population adjustment factor" means the percentage that   HB3098 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1results when (i) the population of Illinois, as reported in 2the most recent federal decennial census, is divided by (ii) 3the population of the United States, as reported in the most 4recent federal decennial census.5    "Return share" means the percentage, by weight, of each 6CED category that is returned to the program collection sites 7and one-day collection events operated by or on behalf of 8either a manufacturer clearinghouse or one or more of its 9participating manufacturers during the calendar year 2 years 10before the applicable program year, as reported to the Agency 11under Section 1-10 of this Act; except that, for program year 122019 and program year 2020, "return share" means the 13percentage, by weight, of each CED category that is estimated 14by the manufacturer clearinghouse to be returned to those 15sites and events during the applicable program year, as 16reported to the Agency under subsection (b) of this Section.17    "Unadjusted total proportional responsibility" means the 18percentage calculated for each participating manufacturer 19under subsection (e) of this Section. 20    (b) By March 1, 2018, each manufacturer clearinghouse 21shall provide the Agency with a statement of the return share 22for each CED category for program year 2019, and by March 1, 232019, each manufacturer clearinghouse shall provide the Agency 24with a statement of the return share for each CED category for 25program year 2020.26    (c) If a manufacturer clearinghouse submits to the Agency   HB3098 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1a manufacturer e-waste program plan under Section 1-25 of this 2Act, then the manufacturer clearinghouse shall include in the 3plan a list of manufacturers that have agreed to participate 4in the manufacturer clearinghouse for the upcoming program 5year.6    (d) By November 1, 2018, and each November 1 thereafter, 7the Agency shall provide each manufacturer clearinghouse with 8a statement of the unadjusted total proportional 9responsibility and adjusted total proportional responsibility 10of each of its participating manufacturers for the upcoming 11program year.12    (e) For each program year, the Agency shall calculate the 13unadjusted total proportional responsibility of each 14participating manufacturer as follows: 15        (1) For each CED category, the Agency shall multiply 16    (i) the participating manufacturer's market share for the 17    CED category by (ii) the return share for the CED 18    category, to arrive at the category-specific proportional 19    responsibility of the participating manufacturer for the 20    CED category.21        (2) The Agency shall then, for each participating 22    manufacturer, sum the category-specific proportional 23    responsibilities of the participating manufacturer 24    calculated under paragraph (1), to arrive at the 25    participating manufacturer's unadjusted total 26    proportional responsibility.  HB3098 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    (f) If the sum of all unadjusted total proportional 2responsibilities of a manufacturer clearinghouse's 3participating manufacturers for a program year accounts for 4less than 100% of the return share for that year, then the 5Agency shall divide the unallocated return share among 6participating manufacturers in proportion to their unadjusted 7total proportional responsibilities, to arrive at the adjusted 8total proportional responsibility for each participating 9manufacturer. 10    (g) A manufacturer may use retail or private network 11collection sites to satisfy some or all of the manufacturer's 12responsibilities, including, but not limited to, the 13manufacturer's transportation and recycling of collected 14residential CEDs from covered entities pursuant to any 15allocation methodology established under this Act. Nothing in 16this Act shall prevent a manufacturer from using retail or 17private network collection sites to satisfy any percentage of 18the manufacturer's total responsibilities, including, but not 19limited to, the manufacturer's transportation and recycling of 20collected residential CEDs from covered entities pursuant to 21any allocation methodology established under this Act or by 22administrative rule. 23(Source: P.A. 100-592, eff. 6-22-18.) 24    (415 ILCS 151/1-85)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)  HB3098 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    Sec. 1-85. Advisory Electronics Recycling Task Force. 2    (a) There is hereby created an Advisory Electronics 3Recycling Task Force, which shall consist of the following 10 4members, to be appointed by the Director of the Agency:5        (1) two individuals who are representatives of county 6    recycling programs;7        (2) two individuals who are representatives of 8    recycling companies;9        (3) two individuals who are representatives from the 10    manufacturing industry;11        (4) one individual who is a representative of a 12    statewide trade association representing retailers;13        (5) one individual who is a representative of a 14    statewide trade association representing manufacturers;15        (6) one individual who is a one representative of a 16    statewide trade association representing waste disposal 17    companies; and18        (7) one individual who is a representative of a 19    national trade association representing manufacturers.20    Members of the Task Force shall be appointed as soon as 21practicable after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 22the 100th General Assembly, shall serve for 2-year terms, and 23may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled by the Director 24of the Agency for the remainder of the current term. Members 25shall serve voluntarily and without compensation. 26    Members shall elect from their number a chairperson, who   HB3098 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1shall also serve a 2-year term. The Task Force shall meet 2initially at the call of the Director of the Agency and 3thereafter at the call of the chairperson. A simple majority 4of the members of the Task Force shall constitute a quorum for 5the transaction of business, and all actions and 6recommendations of the Task Force must be approved by a simple 7majority of its members. 8    (b) By November 1, 2018, and each November 1 thereafter, 9the Task Force shall submit, to the Agency for posting on the 10Agency's website, a list of agreed-to best practices to be 11used at program collection sites and one-day collection events 12in the following program year. By November 1, 2026, and each 13November 1 thereafter, the Task Force shall submit, to the 14Agency for posting on the Agency's website, agreed-to best 15practices for a county, municipal joint action agency, or 16municipality to elect to participate in a manufacturer e-waste 17program and best practices for education and awareness of 18covered entities. When establishing best practices, the Task 19Force shall consider the desired intent to preserve existing 20collection programs and relationships when possible. 21    (b-5) The Task Force shall receive program updates from 22the Agency and e-waste manufacturer program no less frequently 23than at each meeting of the Task Force. The Task Force may 24discuss and provide program feedback at the option of the Task 25Force or upon request of the Agency or e-waste manufacturer 26program.   HB3098 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1    (c) The Agency shall provide the Task Force with 2administrative support as necessary. 3(Source: P.A. 100-362, eff. 8-25-17; 100-433, eff. 8-25-17.) 4    (415 ILCS 151/1-86)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)6    Sec. 1-86. Public Reporting. Each year, the Agency shall 7post on its website the information it receives pursuant to 8subdivision (b)(4) of Section 1-10 showing the amounts of 9residential CEDs from covered entities being collected and 10recycled in each county in each program year. The Agency shall 11notify the General Assembly of the availability of this 12information.13(Source: P.A. 100-433, eff. 8-25-17.) 14    (415 ILCS 151/1-90)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2026)16    Sec. 1-90. Repeal. This Article is repealed on December 1731, 2031 2026.18(Source: P.A. 100-433, eff. 8-25-17.) 19    (415 ILCS 151/1-91 new)20    Sec. 1-91. Education and consumer awareness requirements. 21A manufacturer clearinghouse must carry out education and 22consumer awareness activities in support of plan 23implementation including, but not limited to:  HB3098 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 09345 BDA 19403 b1        (1) the development and maintenance of a program 2    website;3        (2) the development and posting on the program website 4    of educational materials that provide consumers with 5    awareness of the program and the restriction on the 6    disposal of CEDS in Section 1-83, with educational 7    materials provided in digital or printable formats 8    suitable for distribution at retailers, at collection 9    sites, on websites, on social media, or through other 10    relevant platforms that are accessible for use by persons 11    including, but not limited to, manufacturers, retailers, 12    government agencies, waste and recycling collectors, and 13    nonprofit organizations;14        (3) the posting on the program website of all program 15    collection sites, one-day collection events, retail 16    collection sites, and private network collection sites, 17    including the county served by each, for each program year 18    as specified in the e-waste program plan required in 19    Section 1-25; and20        (4) the posting on the program website of the annual 21    program report required in Section 1-10(b)(4) following 22    submittal of the report to the Agency.